Illinois, session 104th, SB2328.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding 6Section 2705-594 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-594 new)8    Sec. 2705-594. Disadvantaged Business Enterprise 9information portal. The Department shall establish an 10information portal on its website for challenges to the 11Disadvantaged Business Enterprise (DBE) program. This portal 12shall include:13        (1) all active and pending litigation against the DBE 14    program, including links to all relevant briefs and 15    orders;16        (2) information on the Department's procedures and 17    policies to comply with any court orders;18        (3) the names of any prime contractors or 19    subcontractors who have brought claims against the 20    Department or exercised any rights pursuant to a court 21    order to eliminate any DBE goals for any projects;22        (4) all projects that have had DBE goals removed 23    pursuant to litigation; and  SB2328- 2 -LRB104 10773 LNS 20853 b1        (5) all federal administrative actions related to the 2    DBE program and the Department's policies and procedures 3    it has implemented to comply with any federal actions. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.